Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-1766
Executive committee.

The board of directors may appoint from its own number an executive committee, consisting of not less than three directors, which may be authorized to act for the board in all respects, subject to any conditions or limitations prescribed by the board.

Laws 1996, LB 948, § 66.